Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 32 Advertising of Rhode Island Products

21-32-1.
Advertising of Rhode Island grown farm products, eggs, poultry, and turkeys produced in this state.

Only farm products grown and eggs, poultry, and turkeys produced in Rhode Island shall be advertised or sold in Rhode Island as “native,” “native grown,” “Rhode Island grown,” or under terms of similar import. Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation advertising farm products as “native,” “native grown” or “Rhode Island grown” shall be required to furnish proof that the products were grown or produced in Rhode Island if requested so to do by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 54, § 1.

21-32-2.
Enforcement — Penalty.

The director of environmental management shall enforce this chapter. Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each violation.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 54, § 2.